Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.390

Opioid overdose reversal medication—Standing order—Administration.

(1) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Opioid overdose reversal medication" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.41.095;

(b) "Opioid-related overdose" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.41.095; and

(c) "Standing order" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.41.095.

(2)(a) For the purpose of assisting a person at risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose, a public school may obtain and maintain opioid overdose reversal medication through a standing order prescribed and dispensed in accordance with RCW 69.41.095.

(b) Opioid overdose reversal medication may be obtained from donation sources, but must be maintained and administered in a manner consistent with a standing order issued in accordance with RCW 69.41.095.

(c) A school district must obtain and maintain at least one set of opioid overdose reversal medication doses in each of its public schools as provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection. A school district that demonstrates a good faith effort to obtain the opioid overdose reversal medication through a donation source, but is unable to do so, is exempt from the requirement in this subsection (2)(c).

(3)(a) The following personnel may distribute or administer the school-owned opioid overdose reversal medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose pursuant to a prescription or a standing order issued in accordance with RCW 69.41.095: (i) A school nurse; (ii) a health care professional or trained staff person located at a health care clinic on public school property or under contract with the school district; or (iii) designated trained school personnel.

(b) Opioid overdose reversal medication may be used on school property, including the school building, playground, and school bus, as well as during field trips or sanctioned excursions away from school property. A school nurse or designated trained school personnel may carry an appropriate supply of school-owned opioid overdose reversal medication on field trips or sanctioned excursions.

(c) Public schools are encouraged to include opioid overdose reversal medication in each first aid kit maintained on school property and in any coach or sports first aid kits maintained by the public school, provided that these kits are not accessible to people other than school personnel who have been designated to distribute or administer opioid overdose reversal medication under this section.

(d) Public schools are encouraged to include at least one location of opioid overdose reversal medication on the school's emergency map.

(4) Training for school personnel who have been designated to distribute or administer opioid overdose reversal medication under this section must meet the requirements for training described in RCW 28A.210.395 and any rules or guidelines for such training adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Each public school is encouraged to designate and train at least one school personnel to distribute and administer opioid overdose reversal medication if the public school does not have a full-time school nurse or trained health care clinic staff.

(5)(a) The liability of a person or entity who complies with this section and RCW 69.41.095 is limited as described in RCW 69.41.095.

(b) If a student is injured or harmed due to the administration of opioid overdose reversal medication that a practitioner, as defined in RCW 69.41.095, has prescribed and a pharmacist has dispensed to a school under this section, the practitioner and pharmacist may not be held responsible for the injury unless he or she acted with conscious disregard for safety.

(6) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.

[ 2024 c 214 s 1; 2019 c 314 s 39.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.